Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB243.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 613 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 613. Submission of Budget to General Assembly.--* * 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 *(d) The budget shall include seven-year financial statements for all active Commonwealth funds, including all special funds that are determined to be government funds, proprietary funds or fiduciary funds. For the purposes of this subsection, a seven- year financial statement shall mean the actual accounting for the fiscal year that is one year prior to the current fiscal year, the available accounting for the current fiscal year, the proposed budget for the ensuing fiscal year and the estimated accounting for the four subsequent fiscal years.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0243PN0194 - 2 - 1234567891011